public_html/app/tools/lang/data/dict-vec-IT-oxt/dictionaries/vec-IT.aff
FLAG long
SFX xM èser sarò/J1I1 èser	ds:indicative+future is:first+singular	# T4 + rò
SFX xM èser sarà/J1I1 èser	ds:indicative+future is:first+singular	# T4 + rà
SFX xM èser saremo/J2 èser	ds:indicative+future is:first+plural	# T4 + r[éí]mo
SFX xM èser sarémoi/I2 èser	ds:indicative+future is:first+plural ds:interrogative	# T4 + r[éí]mo
SFX xM èser sarimo/J2 èser	ds:indicative+future is:first+plural	# T4 + r[éí]mo
SFX xM èser sarímoi/I2 èser	ds:indicative+future is:first+plural ds:interrogative	# T4 + r[éí]mo
SFX xM èser sarà/J3I3 èser	ds:indicative+future is:second+singular	# T4 + rà
SFX xM èser saré/J3I3 èser	ds:indicative+future is:second+singular	# T4 + ré
SFX xM èser saré/J4I4 èser	ds:indicative+future is:second+plural	# T4 + ré
SFX xM èser sarí/J4I4 èser	ds:indicative+future is:second+plural	# T4 + rí
SFX xM èser sarà/J5j5 èser	ds:indicative+future is:third	# T4 + rà
SFX xM èser saría èser	ds:conditional+present is:first+singular	# T4 + ría
SFX xM èser saríe èser	ds:conditional+present is:first+singular	# T4 + ríe
SFX xM èser sarésimo èser	ds:conditional+present is:first+plural	# T4 + résimo
SFX xM èser sarísimo èser	ds:conditional+present is:first+plural	# T4 + rísimo
SFX xM èser saría èser	ds:conditional+present is:second+singular	# T4 + ría
SFX xM èser saresi/J4 èser	ds:conditional+present is:second+plural	# T4 + rési
SFX xM èser sarésïu/I4 èser	ds:conditional+present is:second+plural ds:interrogative	# T4 + rési
SFX xM èser saresi/J3 èser	ds:conditional+present is:second+singular	# T4 + rési
SFX xM èser sarésitu/I3 èser	ds:conditional+present is:second+singular ds:interrogative	# T4 + rési
SFX xM èser saría èser	ds:conditional+present is:third	# T4 + ría
SFX xM èser sarave/J1J6 èser	ds:conditional+present is:first+singular	# T4 + rà(v)e
SFX xM èser saràvemi/I1I6 èser	ds:conditional+present is:first+singular ds:interrogative	# T4 + rà(v)e
SFX xM èser sarave/J2 èser	ds:conditional+present is:first+plural	# T4 + rà(v)e
SFX xM èser saràvei/I2 èser	ds:conditional+present is:first+plural ds:interrogative	# T4 + rà(v)e
SFX xM èser sarave/J3 èser	ds:conditional+present is:second+singular	# T4 + rà(v)e
SFX xM èser saràvetu/I3 èser	ds:conditional+present is:second+singular ds:interrogative	# T4 + rà(v)e
SFX xM èser sarave/J4 èser	ds:conditional+present is:second+plural	# T4 + rà(v)e
SFX xM èser saràveu/I4 èser	ds:conditional+present is:second+plural ds:interrogative	# T4 + rà(v)e
SFX xM èser sarave/J7j7 èser	ds:conditional+present is:third	# T4 + rà(v)e
SFX xM èser sarae/J1 èser	ds:conditional+present is:first+singular	# T4 + rà(v)e
SFX xM èser saràemi/I1 èser	ds:conditional+present is:first+singular ds:interrogative	# T4 + rà(v)e
SFX xM èser sarèe/J1 èser	ds:conditional+present is:first+singular	# T4 + rà(v)e
SFX xM èser sarèemi/I1 èser	ds:conditional+present is:first+singular ds:interrogative	# T4 + rà(v)e
SFX xM èser sarae/J2 èser	ds:conditional+present is:first+plural	# T4 + rà(v)e
SFX xM èser saràei/I2 èser	ds:conditional+present is:first+plural ds:interrogative	# T4 + rà(v)e
SFX xM èser sarae/J3 èser	ds:conditional+present is:second+singular	# T4 + rà(v)e
SFX xM èser saràetu/I3 èser	ds:conditional+present is:second+singular ds:interrogative	# T4 + rà(v)e
SFX xM èser sarèe/J3 èser	ds:conditional+present is:second+singular	# T4 + rà(v)e
SFX xM èser sarèetu/I3 èser	ds:conditional+present is:second+singular ds:interrogative	# T4 + rà(v)e
SFX xM èser sarae/J4 èser	ds:conditional+present is:second+plural	# T4 + rà(v)e
SFX xM èser saràeu/I4 èser	ds:conditional+present is:second+plural ds:interrogative	# T4 + rà(v)e
SFX xM èser sarae èser	ds:conditional+present is:third	# T4 + rà(v)e
SFX xM èser sarèe èser	ds:conditional+present is:third	# T4 + rà(v)e
SFX xM èser saralo/I5 èser	ds:indicative+future is:third ds:interrogative	# T4 + rà
SFX xM èser sarise/J5j5N0 èser	ds:conditional+present is:third ds:interrogative	# T4 + rà(v)e
SFX xM èser saraƚo/i5 èser	ds:indicative+future is:third ds:interrogative	# T4 + rà
